pt-BR: Modalidade de couve: Baby; Black Magic; Chinesa/Gai Lan; Crespa; Dazzling Blue; Lacinato/Dinossauro/Toscana; Vermelha russa; Redbor; Siberiana; Outra
fi: Lehtikaalilajjike: Baby; Black Magic; Kiinalainen / Gai Lan; Kihara; Dazzling Blue; Lacinato / Dinosaur / Tuscan; Red Russian; Redbor; Siperialainen; Muu
pt-PT: Variedade de couve: Baby; Black Magic; Chinesa/Gai Lan; Frisada; Dazzling Blue; Lacinato/Dinossauro/Toscana; Red Russian; Redbor; Siberiana; Outro
sv: Kålsort: Baby; Black Magic; Kinesisk/gai lan; Krusig; Dazzling Blue; Svartkål (Lacinato/dinosaurie/toskansk); Red Russian; Redbor; Sibirisk; Annat
sl-SI: Sorta ohrovta: Mladi (baby); Black Magic; Kitajski/Gai Lan; Kodrolistni; Dazzling Blue; Lacinato/Toskan; Red Russian; Redbor; Siberian; Drugo
zh-TW: 羽衣甘藍品種: 嫩葉羽衣甘藍; 黑魔術羽衣甘藍; 芥藍菜; 捲葉羽衣甘藍; 炫藍羽衣甘藍; 義大利恐龍/托斯卡尼羽衣甘藍; 紅俄羅斯羽衣甘藍; 紅博爾羽衣甘藍; 西伯利亞羽衣甘藍; 其他
en: Kale variety: Baby; Black Magic; Chinese/Gai Lan; Curly; Dazzling Blue; Lacinato/Dinosaur/Tuscan; Red Russian; Redbor; Siberian; Other
el: Ποικιλία λαχανίδας: Baby; Black Magic; Κινέζικο/Gai Lan; Σγουρό; Dazzling Blue; Lacinato/Dinosaur/Tuscan; Red Russian; Redbor; Σιβηρίας; Άλλο
bg-BG: Сорт къдраво зеле: Бейби; Black Magic; Китайско зеле/Гай лан; Къдраво; Dazzling Blue; Лачинато/динозавърско/тосканско; Red Russian; Redbor; Сибирско; Друго
nb: Grønnkålvariant: Baby; Black Magic; Kinesisk / gai lan; Krøllete; Dazzling Blue; Lacinato/dinosaur/toscansk; Red Russian; Redbor; Sibirsk; Annet
hr-HR: Sorta kelja: Mladi; Black Magic; Kineski/Gai Lan; Kovrčavi; Dazzling Blue; Lacinato / dinosaurov / toskanski; Crveni ruski; Redbor; Sibirski; Ostalo
lt-LT: Lapinio kopūsto veislė: Jauni lapeliai; „Black Magic“; Kininiai / Gai Lan; Garbiniuotieji; „Dazzling Blue“; Juodieji (Lacinato / Toskanos); „Red Russian“; „Redbor“; Sibiro; Kita
th: พันธุ์ผักคะน้า: เบบี้; แบล็กเมจิก; จีน/คะน้าฮ่องกง; ใบหยิก; แดซซลิงบลู; ลาซินาโต/ไดโนเสาร์/ทัสคัน; เรดรัสเซียน; เรดบอร์; ไซบีเรียน; อื่นๆ
vi: Giống cải xoăn: Cải non; Black Magic; Trung Quốc/Cải rổ; Xoăn; Xanh Dazzling; Lacinato/Dinosaur/Tuscan; Red Russian; Redbor; Siberia; Khác
tr: Karalahana çeşidi: Bebek; Black Magic; Çin/Gai Lan; Kıvırcık; Dazzling Blue; Lacinato/Dinozor/Toskana; Red Russian; Redbor; Sibirya; Diğer
hu: Fodroskel fajtája: Bébi; Black Magic; Kínai / Gai Lan; Fodros; Dazzling Blue; Lacinato / Fekete / Toszkán; Red Russian; Redbor; Szibériai; Egyéb
ro-RO: Soi de varză kale: Baby; Black Magic; Chinezească/Gai Lan; Creață; Dazzling Blue; Lacinato/Dinozaur/Toscană; Roșie rusească; Redbor; Siberiană; Altele
cs: Odrůda kapusty: Baby; Black Magic; Čínská/Gai Lan; Kadeřávek; Dazzling Blue; Toskánská / Lacinato; Red Russian; Redbor; Sibiřská; Jiné
sk-SK: Odroda kelu: Baby; Black Magic; Čínsky/Gai Lan; Kučeravý; Dazzling Blue; Lacinato/Dinosaurus/Toskánsky; Červený ruský; Redbor; Sibírsky; Iné
da: Kålvariant: Baby; Black Magic; Kinesisk/gai lan; Krøllet; Dazzling Blue; Lacinato/dinosaur/toscansk; Red Russian; Redbor; Sibirisk; Andet
ja: ケールの種類: ベビー; ブラックマジック; カイラン（チャイニーズブロッコリー）; カーリー; ダズリングブルー; ラシネート/ダイナソー/トスカーナ; レッドロシアン; レッドボー; シベリアン; その他
pl: Odmiana jarmużu: Młody (Baby); Black Magic; Chiński/Gai Lan; Kędzierzawy; Dazzling Blue; Lacinato/Toskański; Red Russian; Redbor; Syberyjski; Inna
ru: Сорт кейла: Бэби-капуста; Блэк Мэджик; Китайская (Гайлан); Кудрявая; Даззлинг Блу; Лачинато (Тосканская); Красная русская; Редбор; Сибирская; Другое
nl: Boerenkoolvariëteit: Baby; Black Magic; Chinees/Gai Lan; Gekruld; Dazzling Blue; Palmkool/Cavolo Nero/Toscane; Red Russian; Redbor; Siberisch; Overig
fr: Variété de chou frisé: Jeune pousse; Black Magic; Chinois/gai lan; Frisé; Dazzling Blue; Lacinato/dinosaure/toscan; Red Russian; Redbor; De Sibérie; Autre
de: Auswahl an Grünkohl: Baby; Black Magic; Chinesisch/Gai Lan; Krauskohl; Dazzling Blue; Schwarzkohl/Palmkohl; Red Russian; Redbor; Sibirisch; Sonstige
it: Varietà di cavolo riccio: Baby; Black Magic; Cinese/Gai Lan; Riccio; Dazzling Blue; Nero/Toscano (Cavolo nero); Red Russian; Redbor; Siberiano; Altro
ko: 케일 품종: 베이비; 블랙 매직; 차이니즈/카이란; 컬리; 다즐링 블루; 라치나토/다이노소어/투스칸; 레드 러시안; 레드보어; 시베리안; 기타
zh-CN: 羽衣甘蓝品种: 嫩苗; 黑魔法; 芥兰 (Gai Lan); 卷叶; 炫蓝; 恐龙羽衣甘蓝/托斯卡纳; 红俄罗斯; 紫叶羽衣甘蓝; 西伯利亚羽衣甘蓝; 其他
es: Variedad de kale: Baby; Black Magic; China/Gai Lan; Rizada; Dazzling Blue; Lacinato/dinosaurio/toscana; Roja rusa; Redbor; Siberiana; Otra